Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 5 Telephone Service

Cross references.

Limitation on powers as to corporations, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V and Ch. 4, T. 14.

Unlawful conduct during 9-1-1 call, §

16-11-39.2

.

Penalty for refusal to relinquish telephone party line in emergency, §

16-11-42

.

Taxation of mobile telecommunications, §§

48-8-6

and

48-8-113

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Regulation of telephone and telegraph services, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapters 515-5-1, 515-6-1, 515-8-1, 515-12-1.